Tennessee, session 114, SB0100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (54).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-251(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee public television council, created by § 49-50-905;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0100
000359
- 1 -